Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.105.080

School districts—Duties.

School districts shall:

(1) Notify parents, teachers, counselors, and principals about the GET ready for math and science scholarship program through existing channels. Notification methods may include, but are not limited to, regular school district and building communications, online scholarship bulletins and announcements, notices posted on school walls and bulletin boards, information available in each counselor's office, and school or district scholarship information sessions;

(2) Provide each student who achieves level four on the mathematics or science high school Washington assessment of student learning with information regarding the scholarship program and how to contact the program administrator.

[ 2007 c 214 s 8.]